Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.01, subdivision 31, is amended to read: Subd. 31. Internal Revenue Code. Unless specifically defined otherwise, "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended through May 1, 2023new text begin , except it also includes sections 70303, 70341, and 70342 of Public Law 119-21, relating to business interestnew text end . Internal Revenue Code also includes any uncodified provision in federal law that relates to provisions of the Internal Revenue Code that are incorporated into Minnesota law. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, except the changes incorporated by federal changes are effective retroactively at the same time the changes were effective for federal purposes. new text end